Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 2. Duties in Regard to Messages; Negligence; Damages.

§§ 56-469 through 56-477.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 738 and 740, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former Article 2 (§§ 56-469 through 56-477) of Chapter 15 of Title 56, pertaining to duties of telegraph companies to receive dispatches and messages from and for other telegraph companies and damages therefor, were derived from Code 1919, §§ 4042-4051;
1922, p. 550; 1977, c. 624; 1989, c. 537. Former § 56-474 was repealed by Acts 1977, c. 624.